District of Columbia statutes.
8-1405

Rules.

Within 6 months of March 16, 1989, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 6, 35 DCR 8663

History

This section is referenced in § 8-1404.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 6-3305.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 7-190, the “D.C. Hazardous Materials Transportation & Motor Carrier Safety Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-169, July 25, 1989.

Delegation of Authority